test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-01hansja_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hansʼa: # Noun (1) hansʼa 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Nom: hansʼa
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Gen: hansʼa
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Par: hansʼat
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Ill: [hansʼahtõ, hansʼadõ]
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Ine: [hansʼan, hansʼah, hansʼahn]
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Ela: hansʼast
     hansʼa+N+Sg+All: hansʼalõ
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Ade: hansʼal
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Abl: hansʼalt
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Tra: hansʼas
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Ter: hansʼaniq
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Abe: hansʼaldaq
     hansʼa+N+Sg+Com: hansʼagaq
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Nom: hansʼaq
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Gen: hansʼadõ
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Par: [hansʼasit, hansʼasiid]
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Ill: [hansʼadõhe, hansʼadõdõ]
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Ine: [hansʼadõn, hansʼadõh, hansʼadõhn]
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Ela: hansʼadõst
     hansʼa+N+Pl+All: hansʼadõlõ
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Ade: hansʼadõl
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Abl: hansʼadõlt
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Tra: hansʼadõs
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Ter: hansʼadõniq
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Abe: hansʼadõldaq
     hansʼa+N+Pl+Com: hansʼadõgaq
